District of Columbia statutes.
44-662.07

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 5 [§  2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5078, 62 DCR 10905